Massachusetts, session 194th, H1543.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1 - Chapter 23B of the general laws is hereby amended by adding after section
30, the following section:
Section 31 – Housing Data Reporting
(a)Notwithstanding any general or special laws to the contrary, the executive office shall
collect and make available to municipalities, state agencies, and other state and regional public
entities in a centralized, machine-readable, screen reader compatible database the following data
for each new development with one or more units of subsidized housing in each municipality in
the commonwealth:
(i) the total number of units;
(ii) the total number of units with long-term use restrictions limiting occupancy based on
income and the total number of market rate units;
of 3

(iii) the total number of units with long-term use restrictions limiting occupancy to
households with incomes at or below eighty percent, fifty percent, and thirty percent of area
median income, respectively;
(iv) the term and end date of all long-term use restrictions based on income;
(v) the number of bedrooms and bathrooms per unit;
(vi) the gross and livable square footage per unit;
(vii) the location of the development, expressed as an address that can be matched to a
geocoded record in a statewide address database maintained by the Commonwealth; provided,
that, for scattered site developments, an address and unit count shall be reported for each
separate parcel.
(b)Further, the executive office shall collect and make available to municipalities, state
agencies, and other state and regional public entities in said centralized, machine-readable,
screen reader compatible database the following data for each existing development which
contains at least one unit of subsidized housing in each municipality in the commonwealth:
(i) the total number of units
(ii) the total number of units with long-term use restrictions based on income
(iii) the term and end date of long-term use restrictions based on income
(iv) the location of the development, expressed as an address that can be matched to a
geocoded record in a statewide address database maintained by the Commonwealth; provided,
of 3

that for scattered site developments, an address and unit count shall be reported for each separate
parcel.
(c)The database established by this section shall be regularly maintained and updated,
with each datum updated no less than annually for each municipality.
(d)Subsection (b) of section 31 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
(e)Subsection (a) of section 31 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended
by striking the word “new” where it appears after the word “each”
(f)Subsection (d) and (e) shall take effect December 31, 2027.
of 3